Texas, session 892, SB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 11.26, Tax Code, is amended by amending Subsection (o) and adding Subsection (o-1) to read as follows: (o)  Notwithstanding Subsections (a) and (b), an improvement to property that would otherwise constitute an improvement under Subsection (b) is not treated as an improvement under that subsection if the improvement is a replacement structure for a structure that was rendered uninhabitable or unusable by a casualty, a natural disaster declared by the president of the United States or the governor, or [by] wind or water damage. For purposes of appraising the property in the tax year in which the structure would have constituted an improvement under Subsection (b), the replacement structure is considered to be an improvement under that subsection only if: (1)  the square footage of the replacement structure exceeds that of the replaced structure as that structure existed before the casualty, disaster, or damage occurred; or (2)  the exterior of the replacement structure is of higher quality construction and composition than that of the replaced structure. (o-1)  Notwithstanding Subsection (o)(2), a replacement structure is not considered to be an improvement if: (1)  the materials used for the construction and composition of the exterior of the replaced structure are no longer available; and (2)  the materials used for the construction and composition of the exterior of the replacement structure are the materials most comparable in quality to the materials used for the exterior of the replaced structure. SECTION 2.  Section 11.261, Tax Code, is amended by amending Subsection (m) and adding Subsection (m-1) to read as follows: (m)  Notwithstanding Subsections (b) and (c), an improvement to property that would otherwise constitute an improvement under Subsection (c) is not treated as an improvement under that subsection if the improvement is a replacement structure for a structure that was rendered uninhabitable or unusable by a casualty, a natural disaster declared by the president of the United States or the governor, or [by] wind or water damage. For purposes of appraising the property in the tax year in which the structure would have constituted an improvement under Subsection (c), the replacement structure is considered to be an improvement under that subsection only if: (1)  the square footage of the replacement structure exceeds that of the replaced structure as that structure existed before the casualty, disaster, or damage occurred; or (2)  the exterior of the replacement structure is of higher quality construction and composition than that of the replaced structure. (m-1)  Notwithstanding Subsection (m)(2), a replacement structure is not considered to be an improvement if: (1)  the materials used for the construction and composition of the exterior of the replaced structure are no longer available; and (2)  the materials used for the construction and composition of the exterior of the replacement structure are the materials most comparable in quality to the materials used for the exterior of the replaced structure. SECTION 3.  Section 23.23, Tax Code, is amended by amending Subsection (f) and adding Subsection (f-1) to read as follows: (f)  Notwithstanding Subsections (a) and (e) and except as provided by Subdivision (2), an improvement to property that would otherwise constitute a new improvement is not treated as a new improvement if the improvement is a replacement structure for a structure that was rendered uninhabitable or unusable by a casualty, a natural disaster declared by the president of the United States or the governor, or [by] wind or water damage. For purposes of appraising the property under Subsection (a) in the tax year in which the structure would have constituted a new improvement: (1)  the appraised value the property would have had in the preceding tax year if the casualty, disaster, or damage had not occurred is considered to be the appraised value of the property for that year, regardless of whether that appraised value exceeds the actual appraised value of the property for that year as limited by Subsection (a); and (2)  the replacement structure is considered to be a new improvement only if: (A)  the square footage of the replacement structure exceeds that of the replaced structure as that structure existed before the casualty, disaster, or damage occurred; or (B)  the exterior of the replacement structure is of higher quality construction and composition than that of the replaced structure. (f-1)  Notwithstanding Subsection (f)(2)(B), a replacement structure is not considered to be an improvement if: (1)  the materials used for the construction and composition of the exterior of the replaced structure are no longer available; and (2)  the materials used for the construction and composition of the exterior of the replacement structure are the materials most comparable in quality to the materials used for the exterior of the replaced structure. SECTION 4.  This Act applies only to ad valorem taxes imposed for a tax year beginning on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.